Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 77 Establishment of Charter Public Schools
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — The Rhode Island Board of Education Act]

16-77-1.
Short title.

Chapters 16-77, 16-77.1, 16-77.2, 16-77.3, and 16-77.4 of the general laws shall be known and may be cited collectively as the “Charter Public School Act of Rhode Island” or as the “Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 1.

16-77-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 2, effective June 16, 2010, and by P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 2, effective June 22, 2010.

16-77-2.1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words shall have the following meanings:

“District charter schools” means schools created by existing public schools, groups of public school personnel, public school districts, or a group of school districts.

“Independent charter schools” means schools created by: (I) Rhode Island nonprofit organizations provided that these nonprofit organizations shall have existed for at least two (2) years and must exist for a substantial reason other than to operate a school; or (ii) Colleges or universities within the State of Rhode Island.

“Mayoral academies” means schools created by a mayor of any city or town within the State of Rhode Island, acting by or through a nonprofit organization (regardless of the time said nonprofit organization is in existence) to establish a mayoral academy as hereinafter described in chapter 16-77.4 (“Mayoral Academies”). For purposes of this chapter the term “mayor” shall include any elected town administrator.

“Charter public schools” means district charter schools, independent charter schools, or mayoral academies.

“Board of regents” means the Rhode Island board of regents for elementary and secondary education.

“Commissioner” means the Rhode Island commissioner of elementary and secondary education.

“Sending school district” means the district where the student attending or planning to attend a charter public school resides.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 3.

16-77-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 77, art. 22, § 6; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 23, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 13, § 4; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 38, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 2, effective June 16, 2010, and by P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 2, effective June 22, 2010.

16-77-3.1.
Legislative purpose.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide an alternative within the public education system by offering opportunities for entities identified in §

16-77-2.1

to establish and maintain a high performing public school program according to the terms of a charter. The key appeal of the charter school concept is its promise of increased accountability for student achievement in exchange for increased school autonomy.

Charter public schools are intended to be vanguards, laboratories, and an expression of the on-going and vital state interest in the improvement of education. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section or any law to the contrary, a charter school shall be deemed to be a public school acting under state law and subject to the Age Discrimination Act of 1975, 42 U.S.C. § 6101, et seq., title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, 42 U.S.C. § 2000d, et seq., title IX of the educational amendments of 1972, 20 U.S.C. § 1681, et seq., § 794 of title 29, and part B of the Individuals With Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1411, et seq. All students and prospective students of a charter school shall be deemed to be public school students, having all the same rights under federal and Rhode Island law as students and prospective students at a non-chartered public school. These charter public schools shall be vehicles for research and development in areas such as curriculum, pedagogy, administration, materials, facilities, governance, parent relations and involvement, social development, instructor’s and administrator’s responsibilities, working conditions, student performance and fiscal accountability. It is the intent of the general assembly to create within the public school system vehicles for innovative learning opportunities to be utilized and evaluated in pilot projects. The provisions of this chapter are to be interpreted liberally to support the purposes set forth in this chapter and to advance a renewed commitment by the state to the mission, goals, and diversity of public education.

It is the intent of the general assembly to provide opportunities for teachers, parents, pupils, and community members to establish and maintain public schools that operate independently as a method to accomplish all of the following:

Improve pupil learning by creating schools with rigorous academic standards in all basic areas of instruction for high pupil performance;

Increase learning opportunities for all pupils, with special emphasis on expanded learning experiences for pupils who are identified as educationally disadvantaged and at-risk;

Encourage the use of innovative teaching methods;

Create opportunities for teachers, including the opportunity to be responsible for the learning program at the school site;

Provide parents and pupils with expanded choices in the types of educational opportunities that are available within the public school system;

Hold the schools established under this chapter accountable for meeting publicly promulgated, measurable, state and charter-based pupil academic results, and provide the schools with a method to implement performance-based and/or other student-based accountability systems, while providing a means to restrict the expansion of ineffective charter public schools; and

Encourage parental and community involvement with public schools.

No private or parochial schools shall be eligible for charter public school status, nor shall a charter public school be affiliated in any way with a sectarian school or religious institution. Any charter public school authorized by this chapter shall be nonsectarian and nonreligious in its programs, admissions policies, employment practices, and all other operations. The board of regents shall not approve a charter to a school whose overall operation or education program is managed by a for profit entity.

The commissioner is empowered to promulgate rules and regulations consistent with this chapter, in conformance with chapter 35 of title 42, for the creation and operation of charter public schools. These rules and regulations shall set forth the process for rescission of state approval of a charter public school, including appropriate protections to ensure the continued provision of education services to the students of the charter public school whose charter is rescinded.

All charter public schools shall adhere to financial record keeping, reporting, auditing requirements, and procedures as required by the Rhode Island department of education and in accordance with federal and state laws and regulations.

No more than thirty-five (35) charters shall be granted. At least one-half (1/2) of the total number of charter public schools in the state shall be reserved for charter school applications which are designed to increase the educational opportunities for at-risk pupils.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 3.

16-77-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 102, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 128, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 38, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 2, effective June 16, 2010, and by P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 2, effective June 22, 2010.

16-77-4.1.
Immunity and liability.

Charter public schools have the same immunity possessed by school districts to suit as limited by chapter 31 of title 9. A charter public school shall have the authority to indemnify its employees to the extent that they are not already indemnified by the school district and/or the board of regents pursuant to §

9-1-31

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 3.

16-77-4.2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 2, effective June 16, 2010, and by P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 2, effective June 22, 2010.

16-77-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 23, § 3; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 13, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 2, effective June 16, 2010, and by P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 2, effective June 22, 2010.

16-77-5.1.
Oversight by commissioner.

Individuals or groups may complain to a charter public school’s governing body concerning any claimed violation of the provisions of this chapter by the school. If, after presenting their complaint to the governing body, the individuals or groups believe their complaint has not been adequately addressed, they may submit their complaint to the commissioner who shall hear and decide the issue pursuant to §§

16-39-1

and

16-39-2

.

Charter public school approval for establishment or continuation shall be for up to a five-year (5) period. In either case, council on elementary and secondary education approval is required.

Local, written support shall be required for a proposed charter that is a network charter school as defined herein. “Written support” means a resolution or ordinance granted by the town or city council for each proposed sending district where the council considers the fiscal and educational welfare of the municipality and students after at least one public hearing.

A charter public school, as defined in §

16-77-2.1

, shall be considered a network charter school if the charter public school encompasses, or will encompass, elementary and secondary schools or multiple elementary or multiple secondary schools.

Charter public schools, as defined in §

16-77-2.1(4)

and authorized as of the effective date of this act [July 13, 2016], shall be exempt from subsection (c) of this section and shall not require local, written support under subsection (c) for any proposed expansion or charter renewal.

A proposed charter, or amendment to a charter for expansion, may proceed through the approval process by removing districts that have not provided written support, in accordance with this section, from the catchment area and may be approved with the remaining districts in the catchment area, provided that the application satisfies the requirements of regulations and law.

However, the charter may be revoked at any time if the school:

Materially violates provisions contained in the charter;

Fails to meet or pursue the educational objectives contained in the charter;

Fails to comply with fiscal accountability procedures as specified in the charter;

Violates provisions of law that have not been granted variance by the council on elementary and secondary education; or

After three (3) consecutive years of operation, is not a “high-performing charter school,” defined as a charter public school that has demonstrated overall success, including: (i) Substantial progress in improving student achievement; and (ii) The management and leadership necessary to establish a thriving, financially viable charter public school.

After denying, or prior to non-renewing or revoking a charter, the department of elementary and secondary education will hold a hearing on the issues in controversy under §

16-39-1

.

The establishment of new charter public schools shall be contingent upon state approval and appropriation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 466, § 1.

16-77-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 382, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 406, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 2, effective June 16, 2010, and by P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 2, effective June 22, 2010.

16-77-6.1.
Additional standards.

No student tuition or mandatory fees may be charged by any charter public school.

A charter public school may include any grade up to grade twelve (12) or any configuration of those grades, including kindergarten and prekindergarten. If specified in its charter, a charter public school may also operate an adult education program, adult high school completion program, or general education development testing preparation program.

It is the intent of the general assembly that priority of consideration be given to charter public school applications designed to increase the educational opportunities of educationally disadvantaged and at-risk pupils.

A student who is not under suspension or expulsion for discipline reasons may withdraw from a charter public school at any time and enroll in another public school in the district where the student resides as determined by the school committee of the district. A student may be suspended or expelled from a charter public school in accordance with the board of regents regulations for suspensions and/or expulsions, and other public schools may give full faith and credit to that suspension or expulsion.

The governing body of a charter public school shall be subject to the Open Meetings Law, chapter 46 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 3.

16-77-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 142, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 2, effective June 16, 2010, and by P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 2, effective June 22, 2010.

16-77-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 142, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 366, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 13, § 4; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 2, effective June 16, 2010, and by P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 2, effective June 22, 2010.

16-77-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 197, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 2, effective June 16, 2010, and by P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 2, effective June 22, 2010.

16-77-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 197, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 2, effective June 16, 2010, and by P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 2, effective June 22, 2010.

16-77-11.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 197, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 38, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 2, effective June 16, 2010, and by P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 2, effective June 22, 2010.

16-77-12.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 23, § 7; Repealed by P.L. 2010, ch. 84, § 2, effective June 16, 2010, and by P.L. 2010, ch. 107, § 2, effective June 22, 2010.